Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.315

Model schools and training departments—Report of attendance.

Annually, on or before the date for reporting the school attendance of the school district in which said model school or training department is situated, for the purpose of taxation for the support of the common schools, the board of trustees of each such regional university having supervision over the same shall file with the board of the school district or districts, in which such model school or training department is situated, a report showing the number of common school pupils at each such model school or training department during the school year last passed, and the period of their attendance in the same form that reports of public schools are made. Any superintendent of the school district so affected shall, in reporting the attendance in said school district, segregate the attendance at said model school or training department, from the attendance in the other schools of said district: PROVIDED, That attendance shall be credited, if credit be given therefor, to the school district in which the pupil resides.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 57. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.315; prior: 1917 c 128 s 3; 1907 c 97 s 3; RRS s 4614. Formerly RCW 28B.40.315, part; 28.81.061; 28.81.050(14).]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.